Nevada, session 83, AB77.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 360 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Import substitution job” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 360.750.
Sec. 2. NRS 360.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.750 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a
business in this State may apply to the Office of Economic
-
*AB77*

– 3 –
Development pursuant to this section for a partial abatement of one
or more of the taxes imposed on the:
(a) New business pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or 374 of NRS.
(b) Expanded business pursuant to chapter 361 or 363B of NRS
or a partial abatement of the local sales and use taxes imposed on
the expanded business. As used in this paragraph, “local sales and
use taxes” means the taxes imposed on the gross receipts of any
retailer from the sale of tangible personal property sold at retail, or
stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the political subdivision in
which the business is to be located or expanded, except the taxes
imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The Office of Economic Development shall approve an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section if the
Office makes the following determinations:
(a) The business [offers] :
(1) Offers primary jobs or import substitution jobs or is a
provider of specialty health care or a provider of health care in a
rural area; and [is]
(2) Is consistent with:
[(1)] (I) The State Plan for Economic Development
developed by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
[(2)] (II) Any guidelines adopted by the Executive Director
of the Office to implement the State Plan for Economic
Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which must:
(1) Comply with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) State the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must not be
earlier than the date on which the Office received the application
and not later than 1 year after the date on which the Office approves
the application;
(3) State that the business will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective, continue in operation in this State for
a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection;
(4) State that the business will [offer] :
(I) Offer primary jobs [;] or import substitution jobs; or
(II) Be a provider of specialty health care or a provider
of health care in a rural area; and
-
*AB77*

– 4 –
(5) Bind the successors in interest of the business for the
specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, 5 or 6, the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, offer
a health insurance plan for all employees that includes an option for
health insurance coverage for dependents of the employees, and the
health care benefits the business offers to its employees in this State
will meet the minimum requirements for health care benefits
established by the Office.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
361.0687, if the business is a new business in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more or a city whose population is 60,000
or more, the business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
(1) The business will have 50 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$1,000,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 361.0687, if the
business is a new business in a county whose population is less than
100,000, in an area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more
that is located within the geographic boundaries of an area that is
designated as rural by the United States Department of Agriculture
and at least 20 miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area
designated as urban by the United States Department of Agriculture,
-
*AB77*

– 5 –
or in a city whose population is less than 60,000, the business meets
at least one of the following requirements:
(1) The business will have 10 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$250,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(h) If the business is an existing business, the business meets at
least one of the following requirements:
(1) For a business in:
(I) Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph (II),
a county whose population is 100,000 or more or a city whose
population is 60,000 or more, the business will, by the eighth
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
which the abatement becomes effective or by twenty-five
employees, whichever is greater, who will be employed at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective; or
(II) A county whose population is less than 100,000, an
area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more that is located
within the geographic boundaries of an area that is designated as
rural by the United States Department of Agriculture and at least 20
miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area designated as
urban by the United States Department of Agriculture, or a city
whose population is less than 60,000, the business will, by the
eighth calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
which the abatement becomes effective or by six employees,
whichever is greater, who will be employed at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
-
*AB77*

– 6 –
(2) The business will expand by making a capital investment
in this State, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on
which the abatement becomes effective, in an amount equal to at
least 20 percent of the value of the tangible property possessed by
the business in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year
in which the abatement becomes effective, and the capital
investment will be in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective. The determination of the value of the tangible property
possessed by the business in the immediately preceding fiscal year
must be made by the:
(I) County assessor of the county in which the business
will expand, if the business is locally assessed; or
(II) Department, if the business is centrally assessed.
(i) The applicant has provided in the application an estimate of
the total number of new employees which the business anticipates
hiring in this State by the eighth calendar quarter following the
calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective if the
Office approves the application.
(j) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if the business
[will] is anticipated to have at least [50] 500 full-time employees on
the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, the
business, by the earlier of the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective or
the date on which the business has at least [50] 500 full-time
employees on the payroll of the business, has a policy for paid
family and medical leave and agrees that all employees who have
been employed by the business for at least 1 year will be eligible for
at least 12 weeks of paid family and medical leave at a rate of at
least 55 percent of the regular wage of the employee. The business
[will] must agree in writing that if the Office approves the
application, the business will not:
(1) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee from taking paid family and medical leave [:] under a
policy for paid family and medical leave:
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(2) Discriminate, discipline or discharge an employee for
taking paid family and medical leave [:] under a policy for paid
family and medical leave:
-
*AB77*

– 7 –
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(3) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee or other person from bringing a proceeding or testifying
in a proceeding against the business for a violation of the policy for
paid family and medical leave that is required pursuant to this
paragraph.
3. For purposes of paragraph (j) of subsection 2, the Office of
Economic Development shall determine that a business meets the
requirements of that paragraph if the business has a policy for paid
family and medical leave for employees on the payroll of the
business outside of this State that meets or exceeds the requirements
for a policy for paid family and medical leave pursuant to that
paragraph and the business agrees in writing that its employees on
the payroll in this State are eligible for paid family and medical
leave under such policy.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Shall not consider an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section unless the Office has requested a letter of
acknowledgment of the request for the abatement from any affected
county, school district, city or town.
(b) Shall consider the level of health care benefits provided by
the business to its employees, the policy of paid family and medical
leave provided by the business to its employees, the projected
economic impact of the business and the projected tax revenue of
the business after deducting projected revenue from the abated
taxes.
(c) May, if the Office determines that such action is necessary:
(1) Approve an application for a partial abatement pursuant
to this section by a business that does not meet the requirements set
forth in paragraph (f), (g) or (h) of subsection 2;
(2) Make any of the requirements set forth in paragraphs (d)
to (h), inclusive, of subsection 2 more stringent; or
(3) Add additional requirements that a business must meet to
qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(d) May deny an application if the Office determines that
denying the application is in the best interests of the State.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Office of
Economic Development shall not approve an application for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section if:
(a) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
-
*AB77*

– 8 –
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 70 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(b) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(c) The applicant intends to locate in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for locating that
business in that county.
(d) [The applicant intends to expand in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for expanding
that business in that county.
(e)] The applicant has changed the name or identity of the
business to evade the provisions of paragraph (c) . [or (d).]
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the Office of
Economic Development approves an application for a partial
abatement pursuant to this section, in determining the types of taxes
imposed on a new or expanded business for which the partial
abatement will be approved and the amount of the partial abatement:
(a) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
(b) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
-
*AB77*

– 9 –
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
(c) If the new or expanded business is a provider of specialty
health care or a provider of health care in a rural area and the
provider of specialty health care or provider of health care in a
rural area is not a provider of services under the State Plan for
Medicaid, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
(d) If the new or expanded business is a provider of specialty
health care or a provider of health care in a rural area and the
provider of specialty health care or provider of health care in a
rural area is a provider of services under the State Plan for
Medicaid:
(1) Any abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS that is approved by the Office must be not less than 25
percent of the taxes on personal property payable by the business
each year and not exceed 50 percent of the taxes on personal
property payable by the business each year.
(2) Any abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter
363B of NRS that is approved by the Office must be not less than
25 percent of the amount of tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS
363B.110 and not exceed 50 percent of the amount of tax
otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
7. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer.
8. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect shall,
upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies
-
*AB77*

– 10 –
of all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 2.
9. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
10. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
11. A county treasurer:
(a) Shall deposit any money that he or she receives pursuant to
subsection 10 in one or more of the funds established by a local
government of the county pursuant to NRS 354.6113 or 354.6115;
and
(b) May use the money deposited pursuant to paragraph (a) only
for the purposes authorized by NRS 354.6113 and 354.6115.
12. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office of Economic Development determines to
be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and
NRS 360.755.
13. The Nevada Tax Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations regarding:
(1) The capital investment that a new business must make to
meet the requirement set forth in paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection
2; and
(2) Any security that a business is required to post to qualify
for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
-
*AB77*

– 11 –
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Nevada Tax
Commission determines to be necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section and NRS 360.755.
14. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Office of Economic
Development may petition for judicial review in the manner
provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
15. For the purposes of this section, an employee is a “full-time
employee” if he or she is in a permanent position of employment
and works an average of 30 hours per week during the applicable
period set forth in subsection 2.
16. As used in this section:
(a) “Import substitution business” means a business that:
(1) Relocates to this State from a location outside of this
State or expands in this State; and
(2) Manufactures, produces or sells good or services that, at
the time an application for a partial abatement is submitted to the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to this section, is
imported into this State in significant quantities, as determined by
the Office of Economic Development;
(3) Operates in a sector of the economy that the Office of
Economic Development determines to be critical to the economic
security of this State, including, without limitation, critical
mineral processing, battery production and health care; and
(4) Closes gaps in supply chains, promotes local production
or reduces the outflow of capital from this State.
(b) “Import substitution job” means a position of employment
at a physical location of an import substitution business in this
State.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Rural area” means a county whose population is less than
100,000.
(e) “Provider of specialty health care” means a provider of
health care that is focused on a specific area of medicine, a
specific type of symptom or a specific type of condition.
Sec. 3. NRS 360.753 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.753 1. An owner of a business or a person who intends
to locate or expand a business in this State may apply to the Office
of Economic Development pursuant to this section for a partial
abatement of one or more of:
(a) The personal property taxes imposed on an aircraft and the
personal property used to own, operate, manufacture, service,
maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft; and
-
*AB77*

– 12 –
(b) The local sales and use taxes imposed on the purchase of
tangible personal property used to operate, manufacture, service,
maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary
and except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the Office
of Economic Development shall approve an application for a partial
abatement if the Office makes the following determinations:
(a) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States the date on which the abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application;
(3) States that the business will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the partial abatement is issued pursuant
to subsection 5, continue in operation in this State for a period
specified by the Office, which must be not less than 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection; and
(4) Binds any successor in interest of the applicant for the
specified period;
(b) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtaining a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates;
(c) The business owns, operates, manufactures, services,
maintains, tests, repairs, overhauls or assembles an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft;
(d) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to
its employees in this State during the period of partial abatement is
not less than 100 percent of the average statewide hourly wage as
established by the Employment Security Division of the Department
of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal
year;
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, offer
a health insurance plan for all employees that includes an option for
health insurance coverage for dependents of the employees, and the
health care benefits the business offers to its employees in this State
will meet the minimum requirements for health care benefits
established by the Office;
-
*AB77*

– 13 –
(f) If the business is:
(1) A new business, that it will have five or more full-time
employees on the payroll of the business within 1 year after
receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement; or
(2) An existing business, that it will increase its number of
full-time employees on the payroll of the business in this State by 3
percent or three employees, whichever is greater, within 1 year after
receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
(g) The business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
(1) The business will make a new capital investment of at
least $250,000 in this State within 1 year after receiving its
certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
(2) The business will maintain and possess in this State
tangible personal property having a value of not less than
$5,000,000 during the period of partial abatement;
(3) The business develops, refines or owns a patent or other
intellectual property, or has been issued a type certificate by the
Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to 14 C.F.R. Part 21; and
(h) If the application is for the partial abatement of the taxes
imposed by the Local School Support Tax Law, the application has
been approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the
Board of Economic Development created by NRS 231.033.
3. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall approve or deny an application submitted pursuant to
this section and notify the applicant of its decision not later than 45
days after receiving the application.
(b) Must not:
(1) Consider an application for a partial abatement unless the
Office has requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for
the partial abatement from any affected county, school district, city
or town and has complied with the requirements of NRS 360.757; or
(2) Approve a partial abatement for any applicant for a
period of more than 10 years.
(c) May deny an application for a partial abatement if the
Office determines that denying the application is in the best
interests of the State.
4. The Office of Economic Development must not approve a
partial abatement of personal property taxes for a business whose
physical property is collectively valued and centrally assessed
pursuant to NRS 361.320 and 361.3205.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
partial abatement to:
-
*AB77*

– 14 –
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from personal property taxes, the
appropriate county treasurer.
6. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect shall,
upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies
of all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 2.
7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
8. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and whose partial abatement is in effect
ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from personal property taxes, to the appropriate
county treasurer, the amount of the partial abatement that was
allowed pursuant to this section before the failure of the business to
comply unless the Nevada Tax Commission determines that the
business has substantially complied with the requirements of this
section. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320,
the business shall, in addition to the amount of the partial abatement
required to be repaid pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the
amount due at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS
99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the
month following the period for which the payment would have been
made had the partial abatement not been approved until the date of
payment of the tax.
9. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
10. The Nevada Tax Commission may adopt such regulations
as the Commission determines are necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
11. An applicant for a partial abatement who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
-
*AB77*

– 15 –
a court of competent jurisdiction to review the decision in the
manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Aircraft” means any fixed-wing, rotary-wing or unmanned
aerial vehicle.
(b) “Component of an aircraft” means any:
(1) Element that makes up the physical structure of an
aircraft, or is affixed thereto;
(2) Mechanical, electrical or other system of an aircraft,
including, without limitation, any component thereof; and
(3) Raw material or processed material, part, machinery,
tool, chemical, gas or equipment used to operate, manufacture,
service, maintain, test, repair, overhaul or assemble an aircraft or
component of an aircraft.
(c) “Full-time employee” means a person who is in a permanent
position of employment and works an average of 30 hours per week
during the applicable period set forth in subparagraph (3) of
paragraph (a) of subsection 2.
(d) “Local sales and use taxes” means any taxes imposed on the
gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal
property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in any
political subdivision of this State, except the taxes imposed by the
Sales and Use Tax Act.
(e) “Personal property taxes” means any taxes levied on
personal property by the State or a local government pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS.
Sec. 4. NRS 360.754 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.754 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a data
center in this State may apply to the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to this section for a partial abatement of one
or more of the taxes imposed on the new or expanded data center
pursuant to chapter 361 or 374 of NRS.
2. The Office of Economic Development shall approve an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section if the
Office makes the following determinations:
(a) The application is consistent with the State Plan for
Economic Development developed by the Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
231.053 and any guidelines adopted by the Executive Director of the
Office to implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office of Economic Development which must:
(1) Comply with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
-
*AB77*

– 16 –
(2) State the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
as agreed to by the applicant and the Office of Economic
Development, which must not be earlier than the date on which the
Office received the application and not later than 1 year after the
date on which the Office approves the application;
(3) State that the data center will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective, continue in operation in this State for
a period specified by the Office of Economic Development, which
must be at least 10 years, and will continue to meet the eligibility
requirements set forth in this subsection; and
(4) Bind the successors in interest of the applicant for the
specified period.
(c) The applicant is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by each county, city or town in which the
data center operates.
(d) If the applicant is seeking a partial abatement for a period of
not more than 10 years, the applicant meets the following
requirements:
(1) The data center will, by not later than the date that is 5
years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, have
or have added 10 or more full-time employees who are residents of
Nevada and who will be employed at the data center and will
continue to employ 10 or more full-time employees who are
residents of Nevada at the data center until at least the date which is
10 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing or expanding the data center will require the
data center or any combination of the data center and one or more
colocated businesses to make in each county in this State in which
the data center is located, by not later than the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, a
cumulative capital investment of at least $25,000,000 in capital
assets that will be used or located at the data center.
(3) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the data
center to its employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the
average statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment
Security Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year and:
(I) The data center will, by not later than the date which is
2 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
provide a health insurance plan for all employees employed at the
data center that includes an option for health insurance coverage for
dependents of the employees; and
(II) The health care benefits provided to employees
employed at the data center will meet the minimum requirements for
-
*AB77*

– 17 –
health care benefits established by the Office of Economic
Development by regulation pursuant to subsection 13.
(4) At least 50 percent of the employees engaged in the
construction of the data center are residents of Nevada, unless
waived by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of
the Office of Economic Development that there is an insufficient
number of residents of Nevada available and qualified for such
employment.
(e) If the applicant is seeking a partial abatement for a period of
10 years or more but not more than 20 years, the applicant meets the
following requirements:
(1) The data center will, by not later than the date that is 5
years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, have
or have added 50 or more full-time employees who are residents of
Nevada and who will be employed at the data center and will
continue to employ 50 or more full-time employees who are
residents of Nevada at the data center until at least the date which is
20 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing or expanding the data center will require the
data center or any combination of the data center and one or more
colocated businesses to make in each county in this State in which
the data center is located, by not later than the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective, a
cumulative capital investment of at least $100,000,000 in capital
assets that will be used or located at the data center.
(3) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the data
center to its employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the
average statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment
Security Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year and:
(I) The data center will, by not later than the date which is
2 years after the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
provide a health insurance plan for all employees employed at the
data center that includes an option for health insurance coverage for
dependents of the employees; and
(II) The health care benefits provided to employees
employed at the data center will meet the minimum requirements for
health care benefits established by the Office of Economic
Development by regulation pursuant to subsection 13.
(4) At least 50 percent of the employees engaged in the
construction of the data center are residents of Nevada, unless
waived by the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of
the Office of Economic Development that there is an insufficient
-
*AB77*

– 18 –
number of residents of Nevada available and qualified for such
employment.
(f) The applicant has provided in the application an estimate of
the total number of new employees which the data center anticipates
hiring in this State if the Office of Economic Development approves
the application.
(g) If the applicant is seeking a partial abatement of the taxes
imposed by the Local School Support Tax Law, the application has
been approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the
Board of Economic Development created by NRS 231.033.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Shall not consider an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section unless the Office of Economic Development
has requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for the
abatement from each affected county, school district, city or town.
(b) Shall consider the level of health care benefits provided to
employees employed at the data center, the projected economic
impact of the data center and the projected tax revenue of the data
center after deducting projected revenue from the abated taxes.
(c) May, if the Office of Economic Development determines
that such action is necessary:
(1) Approve an application for a partial abatement pursuant
to this section by a data center that does not meet the requirements
set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection 2;
(2) Make the requirements set forth in paragraphs (d) and (e)
of subsection 2 more stringent; or
(3) Add additional requirements that an applicant must meet
to qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(d) May deny an application if the Office of Economic
Development determines that denying the application is in the best
interests of the State.
4. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer of each county
in which the data center is or will be located.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office may also approve a partial abatement of taxes for each
colocated business that enters into a contract to use or occupy, for a
-
*AB77*

– 19 –
period of at least 2 years, all or a portion of the new or expanded
data center. Each such colocated business shall obtain a state
business license issued by the Secretary of State. The percentage
amount of a partial abatement approved for a colocated business
pursuant to this subsection must not exceed the percentage amount
of the partial abatement approved for the data center. The duration
of a partial abatement approved for a colocated business pursuant to
this subsection must not exceed the duration of the contract or
contracts entered into between the colocated business and the data
center, including the duration of any contract or contracts extended
or renewed by the parties. If a colocated business ceases to meet the
requirements set forth in this subsection, the colocated business
shall repay the amount of the abatement that was allowed in the
same manner in which a data center is required by subsection 8 to
repay the Department or a county treasurer. If a data center ceases to
meet the requirements of subsection 2 or ceases operation before the
time specified in the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2, any partial abatement approved for a colocated
business ceases to be in effect, but the colocated business is not
required to repay the amount of the abatement that was allowed
before the date on which the abatement ceases to be in effect. A data
center shall provide the Executive Director of the Office and the
Department with a list of the colocated businesses that are qualified
to receive a partial abatement pursuant to this subsection and shall
notify the Executive Director within 30 days after any change to the
list. The Executive Director shall provide the list and any updates to
the list to the Department and the county treasurer of each affected
county.
6. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or a data center whose partial abatement is in effect shall, upon the
request of the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies of all
records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the requirements
of subsection 2.
7. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
8. If a data center whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
-
*AB77*

– 20 –
 the data center shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
failure of the data center to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the data center has substantially
complied with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the data center shall, in
addition to the amount of the partial abatement required to be repaid
pursuant to this subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the
rate most recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each
month, or portion thereof, from the last day of the month following
the period for which the payment would have been made had the
partial abatement not been approved until the date of payment of the
tax.
9. A county treasurer:
(a) Shall deposit any money that he or she receives pursuant to
subsection 5 or 8 in one or more of the funds established by a local
government of the county pursuant to NRS 354.6113 or 354.6115;
and
(b) May use the money deposited pursuant to paragraph (a) only
for the purposes authorized by NRS 354.6113 and 354.6115.
10. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Office of Economic
Development may petition for judicial review in the manner
provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
11. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada for
the purposes of this section, a data center must maintain the
following documents in the personnel file of the employee:
(a) A copy of the current and valid Nevada driver’s license of
the employee or a current and valid identification card for the
employee issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more motor
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle registration
of at least one of those vehicles;
(c) Proof that the employee is a full-time employee; and
(d) Proof that the employee is covered by the health insurance
plan which the data center is required to provide pursuant to sub-
subparagraph (I) of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (d) of subsection
2 or sub-subparagraph (I) of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (e) of
subsection 2.
12. For the purpose of obtaining from the Executive Director
of the Office of Economic Development any waiver of the
requirements set forth in subparagraph (4) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 2 or subparagraph (4) of paragraph (e) of subsection 2, a
-
*AB77*

– 21 –
data center must submit to the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development written documentation of the efforts to
meet the requirements and documented proof that an insufficient
number of Nevada residents is available and qualified for
employment.
13. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall adopt regulations relating to the minimum level of
health care benefits that a data center must provide to its employees
to meet the requirement set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of
subsection 2;
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Office determines to
be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section; and
(c) Shall not approve any application for a partial abatement
submitted pursuant to this section which is received on or after
January 1, 2036.
14. The Nevada Tax Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations regarding:
(1) The capital investment necessary to meet the requirement
set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection 2; and
(2) Any security that a data center is required to post to
qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Nevada Tax
Commission determines to be necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
15. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Colocated business” means a person who enters into a
contract with a data center that is qualified to receive an abatement
pursuant to this section to use or occupy all or part of the data
center.
(b) “Data center” means one or more buildings located at one or
more physical locations in this State which house a group of
networked server computers for the purpose of centralizing the
storage, management and dissemination of data and information
pertaining to one or more businesses and includes any modular or
preassembled components, associated telecommunications and
storage systems and, if the data center includes more than one
building or physical location, any network or connection between
such buildings or physical locations.
(c) “Full-time employee” means a person who is in a permanent
position of employment and works an average of 30 hours per week
during the applicable period set forth in paragraph (d) or (e) of
subsection 2.
-
*AB77*

– 22 –
Sec. 5. NRS 360.880 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.880 As used in NRS 360.880 to 360.896, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 360.881 to 360.888, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 6. NRS 360.889 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.889 1. On behalf of a project, the lead participant in the
project may apply to the Office of Economic Development for:
(a) A certificate of eligibility for transferable tax credits which
may be applied to:
(1) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(2) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(3) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(4) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3).
(b) A partial abatement of property taxes, employer excise taxes
or local sales and use taxes, or any combination of any of those
taxes.
2. For a project to be eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and the partial abatement
of the taxes described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead
participant in the project must, on behalf of the project:
(a) Submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 5;
(b) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that
approval of the application would promote the economic
development of this State and aid the implementation of the State
Plan for Economic Development developed by the Executive
Director of the Office pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053;
(c) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project collectively will make a total new capital
investment of at least $1 billion in this State within the 10-year
period immediately following approval of the application;
(d) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
participants in the project are engaged in a common business
purpose or industry;
(e) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that the
place of business of each participant is or will be located within the
geographic boundaries of the project site or sites;
(f) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project is registered pursuant to the laws of this
State or commits to obtaining a valid business license and all other
-
*AB77*

– 23 –
permits required by the county, city or town in which the project
operates;
(g) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of employees engaged in the construction of the project;
(h) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office of the
number of qualified employees employed or anticipated to be
employed at the project by the participants;
(i) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
employer engaged in the construction of the project provides a plan
of health insurance and that each employee engaged in the
construction of the project is offered coverage under the plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer;
(j) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that each
participant in the project provides a plan of health insurance and that
each employee employed at the project by each participant is
offered coverage under the plan of health insurance provided by his
or her employer;
(k) Provide documentation satisfactory to the Office that at least
50 percent of the employees engaged in construction of the project
and 50 percent of the employees employed at the project are
residents of Nevada, unless waived by the Executive Director of the
Office upon proof satisfactory to the Executive Director of the
Office that there is an insufficient number of Nevada residents
available and qualified for such employment;
(l) Agree to provide the Office with a full compliance audit of
the participants in the project at the end of each fiscal year which:
(1) Shows the amount of money invested in this State by
each participant in the project;
(2) Shows the number of employees engaged in the
construction of the project and the number of those employees who
are residents of Nevada;
(3) Shows the number of employees employed at the project
by each participant and the number of those employees who are
residents of Nevada; and
(4) Is certified by an independent certified public accountant
in this State who is approved by the Office;
(m) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (l);
(n) Enter into an agreement with the governing body of the city
or county in which the qualified project is located that:
(1) Requires the lead participant to pay the cost of any
engineering or design work necessary to determine the cost of
infrastructure improvements required to be made by the governing
body pursuant to an economic development financing proposal
approved pursuant to NRS 360.990; and
-
*AB77*

– 24 –
(2) Requires the lead participant to seek reimbursement for
any costs paid by the lead participant pursuant to subparagraph (1)
from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to NRS 360.991; and
(o) Meet any other requirements prescribed by the Office.
3. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, for a project located on more than one site in this State
to be eligible for the partial abatement of the taxes described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the lead participant must, on behalf of
the project, submit an application that meets the requirements of
subsection 5 on or before June 30, 2019, and provide documentation
satisfactory to the Office that:
(a) The initial project will have a total of 500 or more full-time
employees employed at the site of the initial project and the average
hourly wage that will be paid to employees of the initial project in
this State is at least 120 percent of the average statewide hourly
wage as established by the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on July 1
of each fiscal year;
(b) Each participant in the project must be a subsidiary or
affiliate of the lead participant; and
(c) Each participant offers primary jobs or import substitution
jobs and:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
satisfies the requirements of paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.750, regardless of whether the business is a new business
or an existing business; and
(2) If a participant owns, operates, manufactures, services,
maintains, tests, repairs, overhauls or assembles an aircraft or any
component of an aircraft, that the participant satisfies the applicable
requirements of paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 2 of
NRS 360.753.
 If any participant is a data center, as defined in NRS 360.754, any
capital investment by that participant must not be counted in
determining whether the participants in the project collectively will
make a total new capital investment of at least $1 billion in this
State within the 10-year period immediately following approval of
the application, as required by paragraph (c) of subsection 2.
4. In addition to meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, a project is eligible for the transferable tax credits
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 only if the Interim
Finance Committee approves a written request for the issuance of
the transferable tax credits. Such a request may only be submitted
by the Office and only after the Office has approved the application
submitted for the project pursuant to subsection 2. The Interim
Finance Committee may approve a request submitted pursuant to
-
*AB77*

– 25 –
this subsection only if the Interim Finance Committee determines
that approval of the request:
(a) Will not impede the ability of the Legislature to carry out its
duty to provide for an annual tax sufficient to defray the estimated
expenses of the State for each fiscal year as set forth in Article 9,
Section 2 of the Nevada Constitution; and
(b) Will promote the economic development of this State and
aid the implementation of the State Plan for Economic Development
developed by the Executive Director of the Office pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
5. An application submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
include:
(a) A detailed description of the project, including a description
of the common purpose or business endeavor in which the
participants in the project are engaged;
(b) A detailed description of the location of the project,
including a precise description of the geographic boundaries of the
project site or sites;
(c) The name and business address of each participant in the
project, which must be an address in this State;
(d) A detailed description of the plan by which the participants
in the project intend to comply with the requirement that the
participants collectively make a total new capital investment of at
least $1 billion in this State in the 10-year period immediately
following approval of the application;
(e) If the application includes one or more partial abatements, an
agreement executed by the Office with the lead participant in the
project not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States the date on which the partial abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
not be earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application;
(3) States that the project will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the partial abatement is approved
pursuant to NRS 360.893, continue in operation in this State for a
period specified by the Office; and
(4) Binds successors in interest of the lead participant for the
specified period; and
(f) Any other information required by the Office.
6. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada for
the purposes of this section, each participant in the project must
-
*AB77*

– 26 –
maintain the following documents in the personnel file of the
employee:
(a) A copy of the:
(1) Current and valid Nevada driver’s license of the
employee originally issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles
more than 60 days before the hiring of the employee or a current and
valid identification card for the employee originally issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles more than 60 days before the hiring
of the employee; or
(2) If the employee is a veteran of the Armed Forces of the
United States, a current and valid Nevada driver’s license of the
employee or a current and valid identification card for the employee
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more motor
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle registration
of at least one of those vehicles;
(c) Proof that the employee is employed full-time and scheduled
to work for an average minimum of 30 hours per week; and
(d) Proof that the employee is offered coverage under a plan of
health insurance provided by his or her employer.
7. For the purpose of obtaining from the Executive Director of
the Office any waiver of the requirement set forth in paragraph (k)
of subsection 2, the lead participant in the project must submit to the
Executive Director of the Office written documentation of the
efforts to meet the requirement and documented proof that an
insufficient number of Nevada residents is available and qualified
for employment.
8. The Executive Director of the Office shall make available to
the public and post on the Internet website of the Office:
(a) Any request for a waiver of the requirements set forth in
paragraph (k) of subsection 2; and
(b) Any approval of such a request for a waiver that is granted
by the Executive Director of the Office.
9. The Executive Director of the Office shall post a request for
a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of subsection
2 on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days after receiving
the request and shall keep the request posted on the Internet website
for not less than 5 days. The Executive Director of the Office shall
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the request.
10. The Executive Director of the Office shall consider any
comments posted on the Internet website concerning any request for
a waiver of the requirements set forth in paragraph (k) of subsection
2 before making a decision regarding whether to approve the
request. If the Executive Director of the Office approves the request
-
*AB77*

– 27 –
for a waiver, the Executive Director of the Office must post the
approval on the Internet website of the Office within 3 days and
ensure that the Internet website allows members of the public to post
comments regarding the approval.
11. If an applicant for one or more partial abatements pursuant
to this section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph
(e) of subsection 5 within 1 year after the date on which the
application was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be
approved for a partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the
applicant submits a new application.
Sec. 7. NRS 360.895 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.895 1. The Office of Economic Development shall, on or
before October 1 of each year, prepare and submit to the Governor
and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to the Legislature an annual report which includes:
(a) For the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(1) The number of applications submitted pursuant to
NRS 360.889;
(2) The number of qualified projects for which an application
was approved;
(3) The amount of transferable tax credits approved;
(4) The amount of transferable tax credits used;
(5) The amount of transferable tax credits transferred;
(6) The amount of transferable tax credits taken against each
allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount used and
outstanding, in total and for each qualified project;
(7) The number of partial abatements approved;
(8) The dollar amount of the partial abatements;
(9) The number of employees engaged in construction of
each qualified project who are residents of Nevada and the number
of employees employed by each participant in a qualified project
who are residents of Nevada;
(10) The number of qualified employees employed by each
participant in a qualified project and the total amount of wages paid
to those persons; and
(11) For each qualified project, an assessment of whether the
participants in the qualified project are making satisfactory progress
towards meeting the investment requirements necessary to support
the determination by the Office that the project is a qualified project.
(b) For each partial abatement from taxation that the Office
approved during the fiscal years which are 3 fiscal years, 6 fiscal
years, 10 fiscal years and 15 fiscal years immediately preceding the
submission of the report:
(1) The dollar amount of the partial abatement;
-
*AB77*

– 28 –
(2) The value of infrastructure included as an incentive for
the qualified project;
(3) The economic sector in which each participant in the
qualified project operates, the number of primary jobs or import
substitution jobs related to the qualified project, the average wage
paid to employees employed by the participants in the qualified
project and the assessed values of personal property and real
property of the qualified project; and
(4) Any other information that the Office determines to be
useful.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, in addition to
the annual reports required to be prepared and submitted pursuant to
subsection 1, for the period beginning on December 19, 2015, and
ending on June 30, 2020, the Office shall, not less frequently than
every calendar quarter, prepare and submit to the Governor and the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Legislature a report which includes, for the immediately preceding
calendar quarter:
(a) The dollar amount of the partial abatements approved for the
lead participant in each qualified project;
(b) The number of employees engaged in construction of each
qualified project who are residents of Nevada and the number of
employees employed by each participant in each qualified project
who are residents of Nevada;
(c) The number of qualified employees employed by each
participant in each qualified project and the total amount of wages
paid to those persons;
(d) For each qualified project an assessment of whether the
participants in the qualified project are making satisfactory progress
towards meeting the investment requirements necessary to support
the determination by the Office that the project is a qualified project;
and
(e) Any other information requested by the Legislature.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, in addition to
the annual reports required to be prepared and submitted pursuant to
subsection 1, for the period beginning on July 1, 2020, and ending
on June 30, 2025, the Office shall, not less frequently than every 6
months, prepare and submit to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature a
report which includes, for the immediately preceding 6 months, the
information required to be included in a report prepared and
submitted pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The Office is not required to prepare and submit the report
required by subsection 2 or 3 if, within 75 days after the end of the
period covered by the report:
-
*AB77*

– 29 –
(a) The Office receives an audit of the participants in the project
for the period that would have been covered by the report; and
(b) That audit contains the information required to be included
in the report pursuant to paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, of
subsection 2.
5. In addition to the reports required to be prepared and
submitted pursuant to subsections 1 and 2, the Office shall, upon
request, make available to the Legislature any information
concerning a qualified project or any participant in a qualified
project. The Office shall make available any information requested
pursuant to this subsection within the period specified in the request.
6. The Office shall provide to the Fiscal Analysis Division of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau a copy of any agreement entered
into by the Office and the lead participant not later than 30 days
after the agreement is executed.
7. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other specific statute,
the information requested by the Legislature pursuant to this section
may include information considered confidential for other purposes.
If such confidential information is requested, the Office shall make
the information available to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for confidential examination.
Sec. 8. NRS 360.975 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.975 1. The Office of Economic Development shall, on or
before October 1 of each year, prepare and submit to the Governor
and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to the Legislature an annual report which includes:
(a) For the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(1) The number of applications submitted pursuant to
NRS 360.945;
(2) The number of qualified projects for which an application
was approved;
(3) The amount of transferable tax credits approved;
(4) The amount of transferable tax credits used;
(5) The amount of transferable tax credits transferred;
(6) The amount of transferable tax credits taken against each
allowable fee or tax, including the actual amount used and
outstanding, in total and for each qualified project;
(7) The number of abatements approved;
(8) The dollar amount of the abatements;
(9) The number of employees engaged in construction of
each qualified project who are residents of Nevada and the number
of employees employed by each participant in a qualified project
who are residents of Nevada;
-
*AB77*

– 30 –
(10) The number of qualified employees employed by each
participant in a qualified project and the total amount of wages paid
to those persons; and
(11) For each qualified project, an assessment of whether the
participants in the qualified project are making satisfactory progress
towards meeting the investment requirements necessary to support
the determination by the Office that the project is a qualified project.
(b) For each abatement from taxation that the Office approved
during the fiscal years which are 3 fiscal years, 6 fiscal years, 10
fiscal years and 20 fiscal years immediately preceding the
submission of the report:
(1) The dollar amount of the abatement;
(2) The value of infrastructure included as an incentive for
the qualified project;
(3) The economic sector in which each participant in the
qualified project operates, the number of primary jobs or import
substitution jobs related to the qualified project, the average wage
paid to employees employed by the participants in the qualified
project and the assessed values of personal property and real
property of the qualified project; and
(4) Any other information that the Office determines to be
useful.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, in addition to
the annual reports required to be prepared and submitted pursuant to
subsection 1, for the period beginning on July 1, 2017, and ending
on June 30, 2024, the Office shall, not less frequently than every 6
months, prepare and submit to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature a
report which includes, for the immediately preceding 6 months:
(a) The dollar amount of the abatements approved for the lead
participant in each qualified project;
(b) The number of employees engaged in construction of each
qualified project who are residents of Nevada and the number of
employees employed by each participant in each qualified project
who are residents of Nevada;
(c) The number of qualified employees employed by each
participant in each qualified project and the total amount of wages
paid to those persons;
(d) For each qualified project an assessment of whether the
participants in the qualified project are making satisfactory progress
towards meeting the investment requirements necessary to support
the determination by the Office that the project is a qualified project;
and
(e) Any other information requested by the Legislature.
-
*AB77*

– 31 –
3. The Office is not required to prepare and submit the report
required by subsection 2 if, within 75 days after the end of the
period covered by the report:
(a) The Office receives an audit of the participants in the project
for the period that would have been covered by the report; and
(b) That audit contains the information required to be included
in the report pursuant to paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, of
subsection 2.
4. In addition to the reports required to be prepared and
submitted pursuant to subsections 1 and 2, the Office shall, upon
request, make available to the Legislature any information
concerning a qualified project or any participant in a qualified
project. The Office shall make available any information requested
pursuant to this subsection within the period specified in the request.
5. The Office shall provide to the Fiscal Analysis Division of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau a copy of any agreement entered
into by the Office and the lead participant not later than 30 days
after the agreement is executed.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other specific statute,
the information requested by the Legislature pursuant to this section
may include information considered confidential for other purposes.
If such confidential information is requested, the Office shall make
the information available to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for confidential examination.
Sec. 9. NRS 231.0685 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.0685 1. The Office shall, on or before January 15 of each
odd-numbered year, prepare and submit to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature a
report concerning the abatements from taxation that the Office
approved pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753 or 360.754. The report must set forth, for each abatement
from taxation that the Office approved during the fiscal years which
are 3 fiscal years and 6 fiscal years immediately preceding the
submission of the report:
[1.] (a) The dollar amount of the abatement;
[2.] (b) The location of the business for which the abatement
was approved;
[3.] (c) The value of infrastructure included as an incentive for
the business;
[4.] (d) If applicable, the number of employees that the business
for which the abatement was approved employs or will employ;
[5.] (e) Whether the business for which the abatement was
approved is a new business or an existing business;
[6.] (f) The following information concerning the business:
-
*AB77*

– 32 –
(1) The economic sector in which the business operates [,
the] ;
(2) The number of primary jobs , import substitution jobs,
jobs with a provider of specialty health care and jobs with a
provider of health care in a rural area related to the business [, the]
;
(3) The average wage paid to employees of the business ;
and [the]
(4) The assessed values of personal property and real
property of the business;
[7.] (g) Any information concerning whether the business for
which the abatement was approved participates or has participated
in a program of workforce development, as defined in NRS 231.146,
implemented by the Executive Director; and
[8.] (h) Any other information that the Office determines to be
useful.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Import substitution job” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 360.750.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Provider of specialty health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 360.750.
(d) “Rural area” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 360.750.
Sec. 10. NRS 231.1467 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.1467 1. A person who wishes to provide a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training may apply to the
Office for approval of the program. The application must be
submitted on a form prescribed by the Office.
2. Each application must include:
(a) The name, address, electronic mail address and telephone
number of the applicant;
(b) The name of each business for which the applicant will
provide the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment
and training;
(c) A statement of the objectives of the proposed program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
(d) A description of the primary economic sector to be served by
the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training;
(e) Evidence of workforce shortages within the industry to be
served by the proposed program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training;
-
*AB77*

– 33 –
(f) Evidence that there is an insufficient number of existing
programs to develop the workforce needed for the industry to be
served by the proposed program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training;
(g) A statement of the number and types of jobs with the
business for which the applicant will provide the proposed program
of workforce recruitment, assessment and training that are available
or will be available upon completion of the proposed program;
(h) A statement demonstrating the past performance of the
applicant in providing programs of workforce development,
including, without limitation:
(1) The number and type of credentials and certifications
issued by programs of workforce development provided by the
applicant; and
(2) The number of businesses successfully served by the
programs of workforce development provided by the applicant;
(i) A proposed plan for the provision of the proposed program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training on a statewide basis;
(j) A list of facilities that will be used by the proposed program
of workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
(k) A projection of the number of primary jobs , import
substitution jobs and jobs with a provider of specialty health care
or jobs with a provider of health care in a rural area that will be
served by the proposed program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training and the wages for those jobs;
(l) Evidence satisfactory to the Office that the proposed program
of workforce recruitment, assessment and training is consistent with
the unified state plan submitted by the Governor to the Secretary of
Labor pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 3112;
(m) A workforce diversity action plan;
(n) The estimated cost of the proposed program of workforce
recruitment, assessment and training;
(o) A statement by the business for which the applicant will
provide the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment
and training, which commits the business to report to the Office
required performance metrics to enable the Office to comply with
NRS 231.1513;
(p) A report from each business for which the applicant will
provide the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment
and training, which sets forth the basis for any furloughs or layoffs
conducted by the business in the 12 months immediately preceding
the date of the application for the job categories related to the
proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training; and
(q) Any other information requested by the Executive Director.
-
*AB77*

– 34 –
3. Any program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training approved by the Office pursuant to this section must:
(a) Include a workforce diversity action plan approved by the
Office;
(b) To the extent practicable, be provided on a statewide basis to
support the industrial and economic development of all geographic
areas of this State; and
(c) Result in a postsecondary or industry-recognized credential,
or an identifiable occupational skill that meets the applicable
industry standard.
4. The Office shall:
(a) Maintain on the Internet website of the Office a list of the
criteria for evaluating applications for approval of a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
(b) Ensure, through coordination with relevant state agencies
and by reviewing any notices required pursuant to the federal
Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, 29 U.S.C. §§
2101 et. seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, that each
business for which an applicant that submitted an application
pursuant to this section will provide a program of workforce
recruitment, assessment and training:
(1) Is in compliance with the laws of this State pertaining to
the conduct of businesses and employers;
(2) Is not excluded from receiving contracts from the Federal
Government as a result of being debarred; and
(3) Has included in the report submitted pursuant to
paragraph (p) of subsection 2 the basis for each furlough or layoff
conducted in the 12 months immediately preceding the date of the
application for the job categories related to the proposed program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
(c) Approve or disapprove each application for approval of a
program of workforce recruitment, assessment and training within
60 days after receiving a complete application; and
(d) Provide notice of the approval or disapproval of each
application to the applicant within 10 days after approving or
disapproving the application.
5. An authorized provider that provides a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training approved by the
Office pursuant to this section or the governing body of a local
government within the jurisdiction of which the authorized provider
will provide the program may apply to the Office for an allocation,
grant or loan of money to defray in whole or in part the cost of the
program. The application must be submitted on a form prescribed by
the Office.
-
*AB77*

– 35 –
6. The Office shall approve or deny each application for an
allocation, grant or loan of money submitted pursuant to subsection
5 within 45 days after receipt of the application. When considering
an application, the Office shall give priority to a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training that will provide
workforce development services to one or more businesses that:
(a) Provide high-skill and high-wage jobs to residents of this
State, as defined by the Board of Economic Development;
(b) Provide postsecondary or industry-recognized credentials or
identifiable skills meeting the applicable industry standard, which
are not otherwise offered or not otherwise offered at scale in this
State;
(c) Impart a course of study for not more than 12 months that
delivers skills that are needed in the workforce;
(d) To the greatest extent practicable, use materials that are
produced or bought in this State;
(e) Are consistent with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(f) Are consistent with the unified state plan submitted by the
Governor to the Secretary of Labor pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 3112.
7. An authorized provider may use money distributed pursuant
to this section:
(a) To provide curriculum development and instructional
services;
(b) To pay for equipment or technology necessary to conduct the
training;
(c) To pay training fees or tuition for the program of workforce
recruitment, assessment and training, which are not otherwise
covered by the program budget or other workforce development
funding;
(d) To promote the program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training and for job recruiting and assessments
conducted through the program;
(e) To provide analysis of on-site training;
(f) To pay any costs relating to the rental of instructional
facilities, including, without limitation, utilities and costs relating to
the storage and transportation of equipment and supplies;
(g) To pay administrative and personnel costs, except that not
more than 10 percent of the money distributed pursuant to this
section is used for such purposes; and
(h) To pay any other costs, not including administrative and
personnel costs, necessary to effectively carry out the program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training.
-
*AB77*

– 36 –
8. Equipment purchased with money distributed as a grant
pursuant to this section is the property of the Office. At the end of
the grant period, the Office may recapture the equipment for
redistribution to other programs of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training provided by an authorized provider.
9. A business in this State may apply to the Office to
participate in an approved program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training provided by an authorized provider. The
application must be submitted on a form prescribed by the Office
and must include, without limitation:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the business;
(b) Proof satisfactory to the Office that the business is consistent
with the State Plan for Economic Development developed by the
Executive Director pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053;
(c) A description of the number and types of jobs that the
business expects will be created as a result of its participation in
the program of workforce recruitment, assessment and training and
the wages the business expects to pay to persons employed in those
jobs;
(d) The types of services which will be provided to the business
through the program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training;
(e) A workforce diversity action plan approved by the Office;
and
(f) Any other information required by the Office.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Import substitution job” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 360.750.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Provider of specialty health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 360.750.
(d) “Rural area” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 360.750.
Sec. 11. NRS 701A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Office of Economic Development may grant a business a partial
abatement from the taxes imposed on real property pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS if : [a:]
(a) [Business that engages] The business:
(1) Engages in the primary trade of preparing, fabricating,
manufacturing or otherwise processing raw material or an
intermediate product through a process in which at least 50 percent
of the material or product is recycled on-site; [or
(b) Business that includes]
-
*AB77*

– 37 –
(2) Includes as a primary component a facility for the
generation of electricity from recycled material [,
 is found by the Office of Economic Development to have] or a
facility for the production of biofuels, biomass or other primary
fuels from recycled material; or
(3) Primarily engages in the recycling or repurposing of
materials that were used to produce or store renewable energy,
including, without limitation, materials used in solar panels, or
waste materials resulting from the extraction of minerals;
(b) The Office finds that the business has as a primary purpose
the conservation of energy , [or] the substitution of other sources of
energy for fossil sources of energy [and] or the advancement of the
environmental sustainability and energy goals of this State;
(c) The business obtains certification from the Office [of
Economic Development] pursuant to NRS 360.750 [, the Office
may, if the] ; and
(d) The business [additionally] satisfies the requirements set
forth in subsection 2 of NRS 361.0687 . [, grant to the business a
partial abatement from the taxes imposed on real property pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS.]
2. If a partial abatement from the taxes imposed on real
property pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS is approved by the Office
of Economic Development pursuant to NRS 360.750 for a business
described in subsection 1:
(a) The partial abatement must:
(1) Be for a duration of at least 1 year but not more than 10
years;
(2) Not exceed 50 percent of the taxes on real property
payable by the business each year; and
(3) Be administered and carried out in the manner set forth in
NRS 360.750.
(b) The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development shall notify the county assessor of the county in which
the business is located of the approval of the partial abatement,
including, without limitation, the duration and percentage of the
partial abatement that the Office granted. The Executive Director
shall, on or before April 15 of each year, advise the county assessor
of each county in which a business qualifies for a partial abatement
during the current fiscal year as to whether the business is still
eligible for the partial abatement in the next succeeding fiscal year.
3. The partial abatement provided in this section applies only
to the business for which certification was granted pursuant to NRS
360.750 and the property used in connection with that business. The
exemption does not apply to property in this State that is not related
to the business for which the certification was granted pursuant to
-
*AB77*

– 38 –
NRS 360.750 or to property in existence and subject to taxation
before the certification was granted.
4. As used in this section [, “facility] :
(a) “Anaerobic digestion” means the breaking down of
organic waste using anaerobic bacteria to create biogas.
(b) “Biofuel” means any alcohol, ether, ester or other
chemical compound made from herbaceous plants, woody plants
or organic waste.
(c) “Biomass” means any organic matter that is available on a
renewable basis, including, without limitation:
(1) Agricultural crops and agricultural wastes and
residues;
(2) Wood and wood wastes and residues;
(3) Animal wastes;
(4) Municipal wastes; and
(5) Aquatic plants.
(d) “Facility for the generation of electricity from recycled
material” means a facility for the generation of electricity that uses
recycled material as its primary fuel, including material from:
[(a)] (1) Industrial or domestic waste, other than hazardous
waste, even though it includes a product made from oil, natural gas
or coal, such as plastics, asphalt shingles or tires;
[(b)] (2) Agricultural crops, whether terrestrial or aquatic, and
agricultural waste, such as manure and residue from crops; and
[(c)] (3) Municipal waste, such as sewage and sludge.
 The term includes all the equipment in the facility used to process
and convert into electricity the energy derived from a recycled
material fuel.
(e) “Facility for the production of biofuels, biomass or other
primary fuels from recycled material” means a facility for the
production of biofuels, biomass or other primary fuels that uses
recycled material to produce biofuels, biomass or other primary
fuels for use in the generation of energy, including material from:
(1) Industrial or domestic waste, other than hazardous
waste, even though it includes a product made from oil, natural
gas or coal, such as plastics, asphalt shingles or tires;
(2) Agricultural crops, whether terrestrial or aquatic, and
agricultural waste, such as manure and residue from crops; and
(3) Municipal waste, such as sewage and sludge.
 The term includes all the equipment in the facility used to
process and convert into biofuels, biomass or other primary fuels
the energy derived from a recycled material fuel and facilities for
the generation of electricity or biofuels, biomass or other primary
fuels through gasification and pyrolysis, anaerobic digestion, the
-
*AB77*

– 39 –
recovery of gas from landfills, modified microbial fuel cells,
triboelectric devices or the recycling of solar panels.
(f) “Gasification and pyrolysis” means the use of heat to
convert waste into synthesis gas.
(g) “Modified microbial fuel cell” means the use of
microorganisms to convert the chemical energy in organic waste
into electricity while simultaneously treating wastewater.
(h) “Recycled material” includes, without limitation, critical
materials, waste materials from the extraction of minerals and
products for the production or storage of renewable energy that
are recycled or repurposed.
(i) “Renewable energy”:
(1) Means:
(I) Biomass;
(II) Fuel cells;
(III) Geothermal energy;
(IV) Solar energy;
(V) Waterpower; and
(VI) Wind.
(2) Does not include coal, natural gas, oil, propane or any
other fossil fuel, or nuclear energy.
(j) “Triboelectric device” means a device that converts energy
from ambient vibrations into electricity.
Sec. 12. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
or otherwise affect any abatement of taxes approved by the Office of
Economic Development or any application for an abatement filed
with the Office before October 1, 2025.
Sec. 13. 1. This section and sections 1 to 12, inclusive, of
this act become effective on October 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 and 5 to 7, inclusive, of this act expire by
limitation on June 30, 2032.
3. Section 3 of this act expires by limitation on June 30, 2035.
4. Section 8 of this act expires by limitation on June 30, 2036.
5. Section 4 of this act expires by limitation on December 31,
2056.
H
-
*AB77*